Illinois, session 104th, SB3079.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Workplace Accountability in Labor Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Contracting" means any arrangement giving rise to an 8obligation to supply any product or to perform any service for 9a public body, other than through State employment, or to 10supply any product to or perform any service for a private 11person where the State provides substantial financial 12assistance and retains the right to approve or disapprove the 13nature or quality of the goods or services or the persons who 14may supply or perform the goods or services.15    "Department" means the Department of Labor.16    "Director" means the Director of the Department of Labor 17or the Director's designee.18    "Final order" means either a final administrative 19determination of the Director or other appropriate State 20agency officer issued following adjudication of a matter as a 21contested case under the Illinois Administrative Procedure 22Act, or where the Department or other appropriate State agency 23has made a finding regarding a violation of any State wage,   SB3079- 2 -LRB104 16842 SPS 30252 b1benefit, and tax laws or regarding the levying of a penalty 2under any State wage, benefit, and tax laws, has notified the 3violator of the finding, and the violator has expressly waived 4the right to a hearing by virtue of having failed to request a 5hearing within the appropriate time limit established by law.6    "Person" means any natural person, company corporate 7officer or principal, firm, association, corporation, 8contractor, subcontractor, or other entity engaged in 9contracting.10    "Public body" means the State, any of its political 11subdivisions, any authority created by the General Assembly, 12and any instrumentality or agency of the State or of any of its 13political subdivisions.14    "State wage, benefit, and tax laws" means the Equal Pay 15Act of 2003, the Prevailing Wage Act, the Minimum Wage Law, the 16Workers' Compensation Act, the Workers' Occupational Diseases 17Act, the Unemployment Insurance Act, and the Illinois Income 18Tax Act. 19    Section 10. Workplace accountability in labor list.20    (a) The Department may post to a list on its website the 21name of any person found to be in violation of any State wage, 22benefit, or tax law and against whom a final order has been 23issued by the Director or other appropriate agency officer for 24any violation of State wage, benefit, and tax laws.25    (b) If the person satisfies the entirety of the   SB3079- 3 -LRB104 16842 SPS 30252 b1outstanding liability ordered by the court or the Director or 2a settlement is reached and all payments have been made in 3accordance with the settlement, prior to the anticipated date 4for posting of the name on the Department's website, the 5Department shall not post the person's name to the list.6    (c) The Department shall update the list on a monthly 7basis, no later than the fifth day of each month. The 8Department shall remove the name of a person from the website 9within 15 days after the Department determines that the person 10has satisfied the entirety of the outstanding liability 11ordered by the court, the Director or other agency head, or 12made all payments in accordance with the settlement for a 13violation of any State wage, benefit, and tax laws.14    (d) A person placed on the list shall be prohibited from 15contracting with any public body until the liability for 16violations of State wage, benefit, and tax laws has been 17resolved to the satisfaction of the Director.18    (e) The Department shall provide notice to the person of 19its intent to post the name of the person on the Department's 20website 15 business days prior to the posting. That notice 21shall include the following:22        (1) the name, email address, and telephone number of a 23    contact person at the Department and a description of the 24    procedure for removal of the posting;25        (2) the specific details concerning the violations and 26    a copy of the unsatisfied court final judgment or final   SB3079- 4 -LRB104 16842 SPS 30252 b1    order for any violation of State wage, benefit, and tax 2    laws;3        (3) notification that the person shall be prohibited 4    from contracting with a public body if the liability is 5    not resolved; and6        (4) notification that the person can request a hearing 7    in writing to the Director no later than 20 days after 8    receipt of the notice of intent to place the person on the 9    list.10    (f) A person who receives a notice of intent under 11subsection (e) may request a hearing no later than 20 days 12after receipt of the notice of intent. All hearings requested 13in accordance with this Section shall be conducted in 14accordance with the provisions of the Illinois Administrative 15Procedure Act.16    (g) The Director shall consider the following factors as 17material in each decision to place a person on the list under 18subsection (a):19        (1) the record of previous violations;20        (2) previous placement on the list by the Director;21        (3) the frequency of violations by the person 22    discovered in previous or still pending cases;23        (4) the significance or scale of the violations;24        (5) the existence of failure to pay;25        (6) failure to cooperate or respond to a request to 26    produce records, forms, documents, or proof of payments;  SB3079- 5 -LRB104 16842 SPS 30252 b1        (7) submission of falsified or altered records, forms, 2    documents, or proof of payment;3        (8) failure to provide goods or services; and4        (9) failure to comply with contract specifications.